Utah statutes.
53A-1-1102.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "High school" means a school that includes grade 12.

(2)  "Statewide assessment" means:

(a)  a criterion-referenced test of student achievement in language arts, mathematics, or science, including a test administered in a computer adaptive format; and

(b)  which is administered statewide under Part 6, Achievement Tests.

(3)  "Student growth percentile" means the result of a statistical model that calculates each student's change in achievement between two or more points in time on a statewide assessment and compares each student's performance to that of similarly achieving students.

(4)  "Sufficient growth" means a measurement of growth greater than or equal to growth at a specific percentile in the 2011-12 year adopted by the State Board of Education in rule.



Amended by Chapter 478, 2013 General Session

